Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2558.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 26.2, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraphs: NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (7) Equipment acquired by or for a city utility under chapter 388 when such equipment is related to an electric generating project. NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (8) The furnishing of a manufactured home, as defined in section 435.1, as well as all work necessary to install the home in accordance with 24 C.F.R. pt. 3285, including but not limited to the erection of the foundation or tiedown system, supporting, anchoring, and House File 2558, p. 2 close-up of the home, and implementing the utility service connections for the home. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2558, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor